---
title: "Silver Living (55+) Master SOP Collection"
permalink: /silver-living-sops/
date: 2026-06-29 00:00:00 -0500
categories: [Real Estate, Co-Living]
tags: [co-living, coliving, market, operators, guests, tenants, silver living]
description: "Standard Operating Procedures for Silver Living (55+) Independent Senior Co-Living Homes."
author: Ralph Pombo
---
# Silver Living (55+)
### Standard Operating Procedures for Silver Living

*Standard Operating Procedures for Silver Living (55+) Independent Senior Co-Living Homes.*

**Prepared by Ralph Pombo**
ralphpombo.com | thecolivinginsider.com
Co-Living Authority Series — For Investor & Operator Use
© 2026

---
Silver Living (55+)
Silver Living (55+) Co-Living Operations
MASTER SOP COLLECTION
Standard Operating Procedures for Silver Living (55+) Independent Senior Co-Living Homes

Property: [Property Name]     │     Version: 1.0     │     Date: [Date]     │     Status: Active

[Operator Name]  |  Confidential
Developed by Ralph Pombo  |  ralphpombo.com  |  thecolivinginsider.com
Contents
Section 1 -- How to Use This Document
Section 2 -- HOPA -- Legal Framework for 55+ Housing
Section 3 -- SOP-SILVER  |  Welcome Conversation Guide
Section 4 -- SOP-GUESTS  |  Guest Policy
Section 5 -- SOP-FINANCE  |  Financial Operations and Payment
Section 6 -- SOP-CHECK-IN  |  Resident Move-In
Section 7 -- SOP-CHECK-OUT  |  Resident Move-Out
Section 8 -- SOP-BIBLE  |  The Property Bible
Section 9 -- SOP-MAINT  |  Maintenance Request Handling
Section 10 -- SOP-CLEAN  |  Cleaning Standards and Responsibilities
Section 11 -- SOP-WELLNESS  |  Resident Wellness, Emergency Contact, and Transition
Section 12 -- SOP-ACCESSIBILITY  |  Accessibility and Accommodation
Section 13 -- SOP-COMMUNITY  |  Senior Community Engagement
Section 14 -- SOP-ONBOARD  |  Resident Onboarding
Section 15 -- SOP-CONFLICT  |  Conflict Resolution
Section 16 -- SOP-EMERGENCY  |  Emergency Response
Section 17 -- SOP-VENDORS  |  Vendor Management
Appendix A -- House Rules -- Resident Copy
Appendix B -- Recurring Visitor Approval Letter
Appendix C -- Source Index
Section 1  |  How to Use This Document
This collection contains the full set of Standard Operating Procedures for Silver Living (55+) independent senior co-living homes. It covers every phase of operations, from the first conversation with a prospective resident through their daily life in the home, conflict resolution, and eventual move-out.
This model is a new concept in senior housing. It is not assisted living. It is not high-dollar independent living. It is an affordable, community-focused alternative for adults aged 55 and older who are fully independent and want the practical and social benefits of a shared home without the cost and isolation of living alone.
Silver Living (55+) is independent senior co-living. It is designed for adults who are fully capable of managing their own daily lives without assistance from staff or outside service providers. This model does not provide personal care services, medical supervision, assistance with activities of daily living, memory care, or any service associated with assisted living or skilled nursing facilities. When a resident's needs evolve beyond what independent co-living can safely accommodate, Silver Living (55+) operators are committed to helping that resident identify and transition to a more appropriate living situation with honesty and respect.
Operators should read this document in full before opening any property. Individual SOPs may be printed as standalone reference sheets for staff. The House Rules document in Appendix A is designed to be given directly to residents. The Recurring Visitor Approval Letter in Appendix B is completed by the operator and may be posted in a common area.

Every operator will adapt these procedures to their specific property, market, and resident mix. That is expected and encouraged. What should never change is the underlying standard: the residents of this home are our highest priority, and every system we build reflects that.

Section 2  |  HOPA  |  Legal Framework for 55+ Housing
Silver Living (55+) operates as age-restricted residential housing. The legal foundation for this model is the Housing for Older Persons Act of 1995 (HOPA), Public Law 104-76, signed into law on December 28, 1995. HOPA amends Title VIII of the Civil Rights Act of 1968, commonly known as the Fair Housing Act, and is administered by the U.S. Department of Housing and Urban Development (HUD).
Every operator running a Silver Living (55+) property must understand what HOPA covers, what it does not cover, and what is required to qualify. This section is not a substitute for legal counsel. It is a baseline of knowledge that every operator carries before they open any property.
What HOPA Does
The Fair Housing Act prohibits housing discrimination based on familial status, which includes having children under 18, pregnancy, or obtaining legal custody of a minor. HOPA creates a specific and narrow exemption that allows qualifying senior housing communities to legally restrict occupancy to older adults and exclude families with children. Silver Living (55+) relies on this exemption to operate as a 55-and-older community.
What HOPA Does Not Do

This is the most important point in this section. HOPA covers familial status only. It does not provide any exemption from Fair Housing Act protections based on race, color, national origin, religion, sex, or disability. Every other Fair Housing protection applies in full to every Silver Living (55+) operator, in every market, without exception.

HOPA does not give Silver Living (55+) a blanket fair housing exemption. It gives a narrow exemption from one specific provision. Screening must be consistent. Accommodation requests must be handled individually and in compliance with federal disability law regardless of the resident's age. No marketing language, lease clause, or operational practice may discriminate on any basis other than age.
The Three Requirements to Qualify
To qualify for the HOPA 55-and-older exemption, a Silver Living (55+) property must meet and maintain all three of the following federal requirements at all times.
RequirementWhat It Means in Practice80% occupancy thresholdAt least 80% of the occupied rooms or units must have at least one resident who is 55 years of age or older. Silver Living (55+) requires 100% of residents to be 55 or older, which exceeds the federal minimum. The 80% threshold is a floor, not a ceiling, and does not obligate any operator to accept residents under 55 to fill the remaining 20%.Published policies and intentThe operator must publish and adhere to written policies and procedures that demonstrate the clear intent to provide housing for persons 55 and older. The existence of this SOP collection, the House Rules document, the lease language, and the listing copy all contribute to demonstrating this intent. Inconsistency between published policies and actual practice undermines qualification.Verification of occupancyThe operator must verify and document the ages of residents through reliable surveys, signed affidavits, or other supporting documentation. This documentation must be reviewed and updated at least every two years. Age verification is completed at lease signing, not during the welcome conversation.
The 80/20 Rule -- What It Actually Means
The 80% threshold is widely misunderstood. Many people incorrectly believe that once a property reaches 80% occupancy by residents aged 55 or older, it must accept residents below 55 to fill the remaining 20%. That interpretation is wrong.
The 80% is a federal minimum, not a mandate. A Silver Living (55+) operator who requires 100% of residents to be 55 or older is fully within the law. The 20% buffer exists to give communities operational flexibility during turnovers and vacancies, not to require younger residents. Silver Living (55+) uses this buffer as an occupancy management tool only.
Age Verification -- Operator Responsibility
HOPA compliance requires documented age verification for every resident. The following process applies to every Silver Living (55+) property.

At lease signing, the resident provides a copy of a government-issued photo identification confirming their date of birth.
The operator records the resident's age and date of birth in the resident file alongside the lease.
The operator maintains a property-level occupancy log confirming that at least 80% of occupied rooms have at least one resident aged 55 or older. For Silver Living (55+) properties operating at 100%, this log confirms full compliance.
The occupancy log is reviewed and updated at least every two years. Any change in resident composition that could affect the 80% threshold is documented immediately.
Documentation is kept on file and available for review if HUD or a state agency requests verification.

Marketing and Listing Language
Because qualifying for HOPA requires demonstrating intent to provide 55+ housing through published policies, the operator's listing copy, marketing materials, and any public-facing communications must be consistent with that intent. Marketing language that implies the property is open to any age group, or that makes no reference to the 55+ standard, weakens the operator's HOPA qualification.
Listing and marketing language should state clearly that the property is 55+ independent senior co-living and that all residents must be 55 years of age or older. The operator's local real estate attorney reviews this language for compliance before any listing goes live.
State-Level Variation -- A Critical Warning

Federal HOPA standards and state fair housing law are not always the same. Several states, including Georgia, did not adopt the 1995 HOPA modernization. In those states, operators may still be required to provide significant facilities and services specifically designed to meet the physical or social needs of older persons to qualify for the senior housing exemption. The federal standard alone may not be sufficient. This is not a detail to discover after opening.

Before any Silver Living (55+) property opens in any market, the operator confirms with their local real estate attorney whether their state has adopted the HOPA 1995 modernization or operates under a different standard. This single question can determine whether the operator's HOPA qualification holds in their jurisdiction.
Connection to Other Sections of This Document
Section 3 -- Welcome ConversationFair Housing rules govern what may and may not be asked during the welcome conversation. HOPA does not change these rules. Age is confirmed at lease signing through documentation, not through questions on the welcome call.Section 4 -- Guest PolicyThe guest policy must be applied consistently to all residents without discrimination based on any Fair Housing protected class.Section 12 -- AccessibilityDisability accommodations under the Fair Housing Act apply in full regardless of HOPA. Reasonable accommodation requests are handled individually and in compliance with federal law.Section 14 -- OnboardingLease language reflecting the operator's intent to provide 55+ housing is a HOPA requirement. The lease clause guidance in Section 14 is drafted with this in mind and reviewed by local counsel before use.Section 17 -- VendorsThe real estate attorney listed as a Tier 2 vendor in the Property Bible is the operator's resource for all HOPA compliance questions, state-level verification, and any fair housing matter that arises during operations.

Bottom line: Silver Living (55+) operates as lawful age-restricted housing under HOPA. That qualification requires consistent documentation, consistent policies, and consistent practice. It is not automatic and it is not permanent. It must be maintained actively. When in doubt, the local real estate attorney is the first call.

Section 3  |  SOP-SILVER  |  Welcome Conversation Guide
Resident Screening for Silver Living (55+) Independent Senior Co-Living
PurposeLearn whether an applicant is a good fit for this home, and whether this home is a good fit for them, through a warm and unhurried conversation.ToneFriendly and informative. This is not an interrogation. Think of it as two people figuring out whether they are a good match.FormatPhone call, video call, or in-person visit. All three are equally valid. See format notes below.Duration20 to 30 minutes. Give it room to breathe. Older applicants may move at a slower pace, and that is perfectly fine.Who conductsThe operator, whether the owner, property manager, or a designated employee. The same process applies every time, with every applicant.Who participatesThe applicant may have a family member or adult child present or leading the conversation. This is welcome and common. Note their name and relationship.Decision ruleNever commit to yes or no during the conversation. Collect the information, thank them warmly, and follow up within 24 hours in writing.
Format Notes
FormatKey DifferencesPhone callMost common. Speak clearly and at a measured pace. Follow up with a written summary of what was discussed.Video callUseful when a family member in another location wants to participate. Treat it the same as a phone call with the added benefit of visual cues.In-person visitPreferred when feasible. The applicant sees the actual space. You can observe how they move through it, whether they seem comfortable, and any physical considerations that may not come up on a call. Always offer them something to drink. Never rush an in-person visit.
The Philosophy
The standard co-living screening call is built around a working-age applicant. Verify their employer, check their income, and walk them through the house rules. That framework does not translate well to a 70-year-old who retired a decade ago and has a fixed pension income.
The welcome conversation for this model has a different purpose. We are not just checking whether the applicant qualifies. We are learning who they are, what they need, and whether a shared home is genuinely going to work well for their life. We are also giving them the opportunity to learn about us.

A well-conducted welcome conversation also serves the applicant. Many older adults approaching this type of housing have never lived this way before. They may be nervous, uncertain, or coming from a difficult life transition. They may have a home that they need to sell or rent. They might also be better suited for another type of senior care. Treat this conversation as a service, not a gatekeeping exercise.

Opening the Conversation

"Hi [name], this is [your name] from [company name]. Thank you so much for your interest. We are really glad you reached out. I have set aside about 20 to 30 minutes for us today. I will share a little about how our home works, and I would love to hear a bit about you and what you are looking for. There are no trick questions here. It is really just a conversation. Does that sound good?"

After the opening, give them a moment. Let them respond naturally. Some applicants will dive right in. Others may be quiet or tentative. Either is fine.
The 9-Topic Conversation Guide
These are not rigid questions to be read in order. They are topics to cover naturally in the flow of conversation. If an applicant volunteers information that answers a later topic, note it and move on.
Q1Tell me a little about yourself and your current living situation. What is bringing you to the point of looking at something new? Coaching: This is the warmest possible opening. Let them talk without interrupting. You will learn more from this single question than almost any other. Listen for: The reason for the move. Is it a major life transition such as a home sale, loss of a spouse, a health change, or a move to be closer to family? Is the story consistent and clear?
Q2What does your day-to-day life look like right now? Are you still working, or have you retired? Coaching: This is the income and lifestyle question without being blunt about money. Let them describe their situation in their own words. Listen for: Whether they are working, retired, or a mix. Whether they seem settled in their routine or in flux. This opens a natural conversation about what a typical day at the home would look like for them.
Q3In terms of finances, rent is due on an agreed date each month. Can you tell me a little about how that would work for you, whether that is a pension, Social Security, retirement savings, or something else? Coaching: Be matter-of-fact and warm. Frame it as logistics, not judgment. Note the specific payment dates they mention. Pension and Social Security payments arrive on predictable schedules, and this is useful for setting the right due date. Listen for: The source and timing of their income. Pension and Social Security are among the most reliable income sources available. They arrive on a government schedule. If income arrives mid-month, note this for lease discussion. Watch for vagueness about income source or amount.

Income timing note: If an applicant's income arrives mid-month, discuss whether a payment date aligned to their income schedule would work better than the first of the month. This flexibility prevents late-payment friction with an otherwise ideal resident and is documented clearly in the lease.

Q4What is your ideal move-in timeframe, and do you have a sense of how long you are looking to stay? Coaching: This home offers month-to-month leases only. This is a genuine selling point for many applicants in transition. If they are testing the concept or unsure of their timeline, reassure them that month-to-month is the standard and all that is required is 30 days notice when they are ready to move on. A cleaning fee applies at move-out. Listen for: A realistic and concrete move-in timeline. If they are uncertain about duration, that is completely fine. Reassure them and move on. Note whether they seem to be in a short-term transition or looking for a longer-term home.
Q5Do you have a car, or do you get around by other means? Coaching: This covers parking logistics and also opens a natural conversation about their mobility and transportation needs without directly asking about physical limitations. Listen for: Whether they drive and need a parking space. If they do not drive, how do they get around? Are there regular medical appointments or errands that depend on transportation? This is useful context for understanding their lifestyle.
Q6I want to make sure our home is a comfortable fit for you. Is there anything about your day-to-day routine or health habits that would be helpful for us to know, such as regular medical appointments, any equipment you use, or anything that affects how you move around your living space? Coaching: This is the key question for understanding accessibility and care needs. You cannot ask directly about medical conditions or disability. What you can do is open a door and let them walk through it if they choose. Keep your tone warm and genuinely curious, not clinical. Listen for: What they choose to share. Medical equipment requiring electrical outlets such as a CPAP or oxygen concentrator, mobility aids, frequent medical appointments, or any other considerations. If they do not volunteer anything, do not probe. Note that the door was opened. Important: residents requiring electric wheelchairs or hospital beds will need assisted living rather than this type of home. This question helps identify that early and compassionately.

Fair Housing reminder: Never ask directly about a disability, medical condition, or health status. You may describe the home accurately and ask open-ended questions about what they need to be comfortable. If they volunteer information, you may discuss how the home accommodates that need, but that conversation must be initiated by them.

Q7Our home has a few straightforward guidelines covering quiet hours at night, shared kitchen space with a labeled storage system, and a guest policy. I can walk you through them now. Does anything stand out as a concern? Coaching: Walk through the rules conversationally, not as a list being read from a document. Be matter-of-fact and reassuring. Resistance to any core rule before move-in is a meaningful signal. Listen for: Whether they receive the house guidelines calmly and agreeably. Practical clarifying questions are healthy. Pushback on reasonable standards is worth noting.
Q8Do you have a family member or close friend we could list as an emergency contact? Someone we could reach if we ever needed to get in touch and could not reach you directly? Coaching: Most older applicants find this completely reasonable. It is also non-negotiable for this type of home. Every resident must have an emergency contact on file. Listen for: Whether they have an accessible support person. Note the name, relationship, and phone number. Also note whether they seem to have a strong support network or appear more isolated. This is useful context, not a disqualifier.
Q9Is there anything else about your situation or about this home that you would like to cover before we wrap up? Coaching: Give them the last word. Some of the most important information in the conversation comes out here. Listen for: Anything they have been holding back. Concerns about the home, questions about the other residents, or financial questions they were hesitant to raise earlier.
Closing the Conversation

"This has been really helpful. Thank you so much for taking the time, [name]. I have a good picture of what you are looking for, and I want to make sure we give this the attention it deserves. Someone from our team will follow up with you within 24 hours. In the meantime, if anything at all comes to mind, please do not hesitate to reach out. Is this the best number to reach you on?"

Green Lights
Not requirements, but these signals carry real weight on a borderline call.
SignalWhat It Tells YouClear, consistent storyThey can explain their situation in a way that holds together and makes sense.Stable scheduled incomePension, Social Security, or a retirement fund with a clear payment schedule. Highly reliable.Practical questionsAsking about parking, laundry, mail, or local doctors. These are signs they are thinking seriously about living there.Emergency contact readyThey have someone in their life who could be reached if needed.Comfortable with house guidelinesReceives the rules calmly. May ask clarifying questions, which is healthy.Specific reason for choosing this homeProximity to family, a doctor nearby, or a recommendation. They chose deliberately.Family member present and engagedAn adult child involved in the decision is a green light. They are invested in a good outcome.Good humor and warmthA shared home works best when residents are agreeable and easygoing. A pleasant conversation is meaningful data.
Red Flags
These are behavioral signals that paperwork will not reveal.
SignalWhat It Tells YouVague or shifting storyCannot explain clearly why they are moving, or details change when you circle back.Pushback on basic guidelinesResistance to quiet hours, the guest policy, or the kitchen system before move-in is a preview of conflict.Hostility or defensivenessCombative or frustrated tone. Wrap up politely. Automatic decline.Income that cannot be explainedVague about income source, unwilling to discuss how rent would be paid, or the story does not add up.Active housing disputeMentions an unresolved conflict with a current or former landlord.Needs that exceed what this home offersRequires a hospital bed, power wheelchair, or a level of medical support that this home cannot provide. Address compassionately and redirect to assisted living options.Unrealistic expectationsDescribes the home in a way that does not match what is offered, such as hotel-level service, extensive daily staff support, or a level of privacy incompatible with shared living.
Special Situations
Applicant is hard of hearingSpeak clearly at a measured pace. Offer a written summary after the conversation. If a phone call is genuinely difficult, offer a video call or in-person visit instead.Applicant seems confused or disorientedBe patient. If confusion is significant and persistent, make a note. Consider whether a family member or advocate should be involved before a decision is made.Applicant is coming from a recent lossThey may be grieving. Be warm, give them space, and do not rush. A recently widowed person looking for community is often an ideal resident for this type of home.Adult child is leading the conversationWelcome their involvement. Address both the child and the prospective resident. Note the child's name and contact information. They are often a key relationship throughout the tenancy.Income arrives mid-monthDiscuss a payment date aligned to their income schedule. Document the agreed date clearly in the lease.Short planned stayMonth-to-month is the standard. Reassure them this is fine. Confirm they understand the 30-day notice requirement and the cleaning fee at move-out.
Post-Conversation Notes -- Complete Within 15 Minutes
Reason for move[Free text]Income source(s)[Pension / Social Security / Savings / Employment / Other]Payment timing[1st / 15th / Other -- specify]Move-in timeline[Date or timeframe]Transportation[Drives / Does not drive -- how they get around]Needs shared voluntarily[Free text -- anything volunteered about accessibility, health routine, or equipment]Emergency contact[Name, relationship, phone]Green lights noted[List any]Red flags noted[List any]Adult child or family involved[Name, relationship, phone if provided]Overall impression[Strong yes / Yes with questions / No -- brief note]
Section 4  |  SOP-GUESTS  |  Guest Policy
This home is a community. Residents are welcome to have people they care about visit during the day. At the same time, a shared home works best when everyone inside it is known, accountable, and respectful of their neighbors. The guest policy exists to protect the comfort, security, and peace of every resident in the home.

Guest policy rules are set at the operator's discretion and will vary by property. The framework below establishes the minimum standards for all Silver Living (55+) homes operating under this model. Operators may add additional rules as their property requires.

Minimum Standards
RuleDetailDaytime visitors welcomeResidents may have visitors during non-quiet hours. Frequency and duration of daytime visits are at operator discretion, provided no complaints arise from other residents.Resident must be presentA visitor may never be in the home without their host resident present. This applies to all visitors without exception, including family members, friends, and caregivers.No overnight guestsNo visitor may remain in the home past the quiet hours cutoff. This is a firm rule with no exceptions and no approval process. The quiet hours cutoff is set by the operator.Quiet hoursQuiet hours are set by the operator. The recommended default is 9 PM to 7 AM daily. Quiet hours apply to all spaces in the home, including bedrooms, kitchen, laundry, and common areas.Functional residencyAny visitor whose presence amounts to de facto residency will be addressed by management regardless of complaint history. This includes visitors present for extended periods across many days each month, even if they depart before quiet hours each night. The test is whether the person appears to be living in the home. If the pattern looks like residency, it is treated as residency.Visitor areasVisitors are permitted in common areas and the host resident's room. Visitors are not permitted in any other resident's room without the explicit approval of that resident and notification to management.
Recurring Visitor Pre-Approval
Some residents have regular visitors whose presence is part of a temporary or time-limited personal assistance routine, such as a visiting nurse during a post-surgical recovery, or a family member who assists on a defined schedule. These visitors may be pre-approved by the operator through the process below. See Appendix B for the approval letter template. Ongoing regular personal assistance that reflects a permanent change in the resident's needs is addressed through SOP-WELLNESS rather than through this process.

Resident submits a written request to the operator with the visitor's full name, relationship to the resident, reason for visits, and proposed visit schedule.
Operator reviews and responds in writing within 48 hours.
If approved, the operator completes the Recurring Visitor Approval Letter in Appendix B. The letter specifies the visitor's name, the approved visit days and hours, the reason for visits, and the approval expiration date.
The approval letter is filed in the resident's record. A copy may be posted in a common area so other residents are aware of the authorized visitor.
Approved recurring visitors are permitted in common areas and the host resident's room only. They are not permitted in any other resident's room.
The resident must be present during all recurring visitor visits. Pre-approval does not waive this requirement.
The default approval period is 30 days. Renewal requires a new written request. The operator may approve longer periods at their discretion.
Approval may be withdrawn at any time if the visitor causes a disturbance, violates any house guideline, or if other residents raise documented concerns.


The pre-approval process protects all residents. A visiting nurse or family member providing temporary assistance is a normal and expected part of some older residents' lives. The process exists to keep the home secure and all residents informed, not to create unnecessary barriers to legitimate temporary support.

No Overnight Guests
No visitor may remain in the home past the operator-set quiet hours cutoff under any circumstances. There is no approval process, no exception for family members, and no override available. This rule applies equally to every resident every night. When a resident asks whether an exception can be made, the answer is no. The consistency of this rule is what makes it fair to everyone in the home.
Functional Residency
A visitor who spends extended time in the home across many days each month is not a visitor. They are a functional resident, regardless of whether they leave before quiet hours each night. Signs of functional residency include regular presence without the host resident, belongings stored in common areas, use of the kitchen or laundry as part of a routine, and a pattern of visits that resembles daily living rather than occasional visits.
When functional residency is identified, the operator addresses it directly with the resident. The options are straightforward: the visitor applies to become a paying resident, or the pattern of visits changes to reflect genuine visiting rather than de facto residency. This is also a revenue opportunity. A person who is effectively living in the home should be paying for the privilege.
Tampering With Home Systems
Cameras, locks, thermostats, smoke alarms, and internet routers are essential safety and security systems. No resident may adjust, cover, disable, move, or tamper with any home system for any reason.
Any confirmed tampering with a home system is an automatic Step 2 violation. No warning conversation precedes this response. Following any tampering incident, the operator posts a public notice in the home reminding all residents of this policy. Repeated tampering advances directly to Step 3.
No Smoking, Vaping, or Drug Use
Specific smoking and substance rules are set by the operator per property and communicated clearly in the house rules. The following minimum standards apply to all homes operating under this model.

No smoking of any kind is permitted inside the home at any time. This includes cigarettes, cigars, pipes, cannabis, and any other smoked substance.
No vaping or use of electronic cigarettes is permitted inside the home at any time.
No candles, incense, or open flames are permitted inside the home at any time.
Exterior smoking, where permitted by the operator, must occur no closer than 15 feet from any entrance or open window.
No illegal drugs are permitted on the property.
Legal cannabis and other controlled substances require a valid doctor's prescription. Even with a valid prescription, smoking of cannabis is prohibited under the same standard as tobacco. Non-smoked forms of prescribed cannabis are handled at operator discretion on a case-by-case basis.

Personal Belongings
Personal belongings are kept in the resident's room only. Common areas are not personal storage. Items left in common areas will be returned to the resident's room by staff. Repeated violations are addressed through the conflict resolution process.
Shared Damage Responsibility
Each resident is responsible for damage they cause to the property. When damage to a common area cannot be attributed to a specific resident, the cost of repair is shared equally among all residents. Normal wear and tear and routine maintenance are the responsibility of the operator and are not charged to residents.
This policy is stated in the lease. Residents are informed of it at move-in. The shared responsibility standard creates a collective stake in the condition of the home and encourages residents to look out for common spaces.
Enforcement Ladder
Step 1 -- WarningFirst confirmed violation: written notice referencing the specific house rule. The notice is warm but direct. Written acknowledgment is required from the resident.Step 2 -- FineSecond confirmed violation: a fine of $[amount] is applied. Written notice is sent. Written confirmation of understanding is required. Any confirmed tampering with a home system begins at this step, not Step 1.Step 3 -- Immediate RemovalA third violation, or any single incident serious enough to threaten the safety or security of other residents, results in immediate removal. There is no additional warning. Access is deactivated at the moment notice is delivered. The resident gathers essential belongings under the direct supervision of the operator or a designated representative. Law enforcement may be present at the operator's discretion. No refund is issued for unused rental days remaining in the current month. This action is taken to protect the safety, security, and wellbeing of all other residents in the home.

Legal requirement: Each operator must consult a local real estate attorney before opening any property to understand exactly what the law in their jurisdiction permits when executing an immediate removal for cause. This consultation happens before a property opens, not when a situation is already in progress. The attorney's guidance is documented and kept on file. Law enforcement should be contacted before or during execution of a Step 3 removal whenever there is any concern for safety.

Note: The enforcement ladder is managed by the operator. A staff member or VA may never issue a fine or removal notice without direct operator approval.
Section 5  |  SOP-FINANCE  |  Financial Operations and Payment
Lease Structure
This home offers month-to-month leases only. This is both a business decision and a genuine advantage for the demographic this model serves. Many 55+ adults are in a period of transition, whether downsizing, recently widowed, testing a new market, or moving closer to family. A month-to-month lease removes a barrier that would otherwise prevent ideal residents from applying.
Lease termMonth-to-month only. No fixed-term leases are offered.Notice to vacate30 days written notice is required from the resident. Management provides 30 days notice to the resident in non-emergency situations.Cleaning feeCharged at move-out. Amount specified in the lease. Non-negotiable.Lease modificationsAny change to payment date, terms, or conditions must be documented in writing and signed by both parties.
Payment
Due dateSet at lease signing. Aligned to the resident's income schedule, whether the 1st, the 15th, or another agreed date.Grace period5 days from the due date. No exceptions.Late feeApplied automatically on day 6. Amount specified in the lease. Non-negotiable. Waiver decisions are made by the operator only, never by a staff member or VA.Preferred methodElectronic payment. Setup is completed at the time the lease is signed with operator assistance. This is never assumed to be self-serve.Accepted methodCheck is also accepted. The payable name, delivery address, and due date are confirmed in writing at lease signing.CashNot accepted.

Payment setup is completed when the lease is signed, not at move-in. By move-in day, the payment method is already confirmed and documented. This removes one task from an already full arrival day and ensures no resident moves in without a payment method on file.

Cost Management

Review all utility bills monthly. Flag any increase above 10 percent from the prior month.
Programmable thermostats with locked temperature ranges reduce HVAC costs significantly.
Schedule a recurring monthly handyman visit to address all routine maintenance in a single session rather than dispatching for each small item individually.
Maintain an emergency reserve equal to 5 to 10 percent of gross rents to cover unexpected repairs or vacancy gaps.
Review vendor contracts quarterly to confirm rates remain competitive.
Conduct a zero-based budget review annually, evaluating every expense from scratch.

Vacancy -- Referral Incentive Program
When a room is vacant, all current residents in good standing are eligible for a referral incentive if they refer a new resident who signs a lease and completes their first full month.
Incentive optionsA rent reduction on the next month's payment, or a gift of equivalent value. The resident chooses.Payout triggerThe new resident completes their first full calendar month in the home.EligibilityAny current resident in good standing who registers the referral with management before the new resident applies.Operator noteThe incentive amount and gift options are set by the operator per property. The referral is documented in the resident file at the time it is made.
Section 6  |  SOP-CHECK-IN  |  Resident Move-In
PurposeStandardize the move-in process so every new resident receives the same warm and thorough welcome.Who must be presentThe operator, whether the owner, property manager, or a designated employee, must be present at every move-in. No exceptions.TimingAll preparation is completed before the resident arrives. Payment setup is already done at lease signing.
Pre-Arrival Checklist -- 7 Days Out

Confirm the move-in date and arrival time directly by phone. Email alone is not sufficient.
Notify all current residents of the new arrival date and room number. Give them the courtesy of advance notice.
Prepare the room: deep clean, inspect all furniture, test the WiFi signal from within the room, and program the smart lock code.
Place all welcome gestures in the room before arrival. See SOP-COMMUNITY for the full welcome list.
Post the welcome note on the refrigerator or bulletin board.
Place the name placard outside the bedroom door.
Label the resident's kitchen shelf and refrigerator space.
Confirm the payment method is on file from lease signing.
Confirm the emergency contact information is on file from the welcome conversation.

Arrival
The arrival experience sets the tone for the entire tenancy. It should feel warm and unhurried.

Greet the resident at the door personally. If a family member is present, welcome them warmly.
Help with bags and boxes. Do not just watch.
Offer something to drink before anything else happens.
Give them a quiet moment to take in the space before beginning the tour.
Begin the orientation tour only when they seem ready.

Orientation Tour
Conduct the tour at the resident's pace. Never rush.

Begin with common areas: the living room, kitchen, laundry, and outdoor space if applicable.
Show them their labeled kitchen shelf and refrigerator space personally.
Introduce the community pantry.
Point out the bulletin board and their welcome note.
Complete the full safety and security walkthrough in person, covering every item below:
The location of every smoke alarm in the home
The location of every fire extinguisher
All exterior and interior lighting
Camera locations and what each one covers
All door locks and how each one works
Emergency exit routes
The water shutoff location
The breaker panel location
Walk them to their room last. Let it feel like a reveal.
Demonstrate the smart lock as many times as needed. The orientation is not complete until they can operate it independently and confidently.


During the safety walkthrough: "Your comfort and safety are our highest priority here. If you ever notice something that concerns you, or if you have any suggestions for how we can make this home better for you, please tell us. We genuinely want to know."

The House Guidelines Conversation
Walk through the house guidelines conversationally. Do not read from a document. Cover all key items, then hand them the printed House Rules document in Appendix A to keep.

Quiet hours and the time they begin and end
Guest policy: daytime visitors welcome, resident must be present, no overnight guests under any circumstances
Pre-approval process for recurring visitors, including temporary medical or personal assistance visits during non-quiet hours
Kitchen and refrigerator storage system and the resident's responsibility to clean up after themselves
Community pantry
No smoking, vaping, candles, or incense inside the home
Maintenance request process: one channel only, clearly identified
Wellness check protocol, presented as a community safety net
Tampering with home systems is prohibited and results in an automatic Step 2 violation
Payment due date, 5-day grace period, and automatic late fee on day 6
30-day notice to vacate and cleaning fee at move-out

Post Move-In Follow-Up Schedule
24 hoursA brief text or call: how did the first night go? Is there anything they need?7 daysA personal check-in from the operator. Any questions or concerns after a full week?30 daysThe first formal check-in. How is the home working for them? Any adjustments needed? Mention the referral program if it has not come up already.

Suggested closing at the end of move-in: "You are all set. This is your home now. If anything comes up, anything at all, here is how to reach us. We are glad you are here."

Section 7  |  SOP-CHECK-OUT  |  Resident Move-Out
Notice required30 days written notice from the resident.Cleaning feeCharged at move-out. Amount specified in the lease.Deposit returnWithin 14 days of move-out with itemized deductions provided in writing.

Send the move-out reminder 30 days before the end date with instructions for room condition and access return.
Schedule the move-out inspection 2 days before departure.
Conduct the inspection on departure day. Photograph the condition of the room, check all furniture against the move-in inventory, and document any damage.
Deactivate smart lock access immediately on departure.
Remove the resident from the community messaging group.
Process the deposit return within 14 days with itemized deductions documented in writing.
Send a warm move-out message. If their experience was positive, request a review.
Schedule the deep clean and room turnover before the next move-in.

Move-Out Checklist for Residents
Provide this list to the resident at least 7 days before departure.

Return all remotes to their designated holders.
Return all keys, key fobs, and access cards to the designated location.
Remove all personal belongings from the room and any assigned common area storage.
Remove all trash from the room before departure.
Clean out any personal refrigerator or mini fridge in the room and leave it plugged in to prevent mold.
Leave the room in broom-clean condition.
Report any damage or maintenance issues to the operator before departure.

Section 8  |  SOP-BIBLE  |  The Property Bible
One document per property. Maximum two pages. Stored in a shared digital folder accessible to all operators and staff from a mobile device, and printed and posted inside a designated cabinet or utility space in the home itself. This document allows any operator, staff member, cleaner, or trusted local contact to manage the home for 48 hours without the owner present.
Core informationProperty name, full address, room count and numbering, and parking notes.WiFi and networkPrimary network name, password, router location, and reboot steps.Access and locksFront door lock type and app. Backup entry method. Bedroom lock type. Lockout steps: who to call first, then second.Utilities and shutoffsWater shutoff location. Breaker panel location. Gas shutoff if applicable. HVAC filter size and location. Thermostat notes and locked temperature range.Vendor listCleaners, handyman, pest control, plumber, HVAC technician, and real estate attorney. Name, direct phone number, hours, and access notes for each.Cleaning cadenceCommon area cleaning schedule. Room turnover process: who triggers it, who confirms vacancy, and photo requirements.Trash protocolTrash collection day or days. Bin locations. Whether recycling is collected separately in this municipality. Overflow rules and move-out trash protocol.Emergency stepsWater leak, power outage, lock failure, WiFi outage: one-line response for each. Emergency contacts listed in order of escalation.

Update rule: Every vendor change, WiFi change, or lock change is updated in the Property Bible the same day the change is made. A stale Property Bible is worse than none. It sends someone in the wrong direction during an emergency.

Trash and Recycling Infrastructure
Set up trash infrastructure based on local municipality requirements before the property opens. Confirm collection days, bin requirements, and whether separate recycling pickup is available in the area. Post clear instructions for residents covering what goes where, pickup days, bin placement at the curb, and where to return bins after pickup.

Provide more trash bins than a typical single-family home would use. A general guide is at least two trash cans plus recycling collection if the municipality provides it, with additional bins for every four additional rooms.
Purchase wheeled bins where the municipality does not provide them. Wheeled bins are easier to move and more likely to be taken out on time.
Drill drainage holes in the bottom of exterior bins to prevent rainwater accumulation. Heavy waterlogged bins are difficult to move.
Store bins in a location that is accessible but away from resident windows and doors.
Install fly catchers where bins are stored. Replace every one to two months.
Provide trash bags for interior kitchen and bathroom bins. When bags are provided, residents use them.
Clean exterior bins on trash day when they are empty using bleach or disinfectant. Inspect for damage and replace bins every one to three years.
Plan for increased trash volume during any move-out period and add temporary capacity if needed.
Consider a trash valet service for properties where residents may have physical limitations that make moving bins difficult.

Section 9  |  SOP-MAINT  |  Maintenance Request Handling
Intake channelOne method only, whether a text line, email address, or app. Post the intake method visibly in the home. Never manage maintenance requests across multiple platforms.Priority levelsEmergency: water leak, no power, lock failure, no heat. Urgent: appliance down, toilet issue, WiFi outage. Routine: loose handle, minor repairs, cosmetic issues.
EmergencyRespond within 1 hour. Dispatch same day.UrgentAcknowledge within 2 hours. Repair within 48 hours.RoutineAcknowledge within 24 hours. Address at the next monthly handyman visit.

Resident submits the request via the designated intake channel only.
Log the request with priority level and timestamp.
Acknowledge receipt within the timeframe above.
Dispatch the appropriate vendor or schedule the handyman.
Document completion with before and after photos for any significant repair.
Follow up with the resident to confirm the issue has been resolved.

Monthly cadence: Schedule a recurring monthly handyman visit to address all routine items in a single efficient session. Dispatching separately for each small issue is how vendor costs escalate.
Section 10  |  SOP-CLEAN  |  Cleaning Standards and Responsibilities
Cleanliness in a shared home requires a clear assignment of responsibility at every level. When it is not clear who is responsible for what, things do not get done. This SOP defines who cleans what and when.
Responsibility Overview
TaskResponsible PartyDay-to-day kitchen and common area tidiness between professional cleaningsEach resident, for their own messBi-weekly common area professional cleaningHired cleaner, scheduled by operatorMonthly deep cleanProfessional cleaner, scheduled by operatorOptional room cleaningHired cleaner, arranged by resident at additional costRoom turnover after move-outProfessional cleaner, triggered and verified by operatorQuality verification after every professional cleaning sessionOperator or designated staff member
Resident Responsibilities -- Daily and Non-Negotiable
Each resident is responsible for their own mess in all shared spaces. This is a condition of residency, stated clearly at move-in and in the House Rules document. It is not a suggestion. It applies every day.
Kitchen:

Dishes, pots, pans, and utensils must be washed, dried, and put away immediately after use. They may not be left in the sink or on the counter.
The stovetop and surrounding surfaces must be wiped down after every use.
Food must be covered before microwaving. A microwave cover or paper towel is sufficient.
Any spills or splatters inside the microwave must be wiped out immediately after use.
Food must be stored in the resident's designated and labeled shelf and refrigerator space only.
Spills on any surface must be cleaned up immediately.
Trash must be taken out when full, not left overflowing.

Common areas:

Personal items must be kept in the resident's room, not left in common areas.
Any item brought into a common area is the resident's responsibility to return to their room when finished.


The framing matters. For this demographic, resident responsibilities should be presented as mutual respect, not dormitory rules. Everyone in the home deserves a clean shared space, and each resident plays their part in maintaining it.

Consequences for Failure to Clean Up
First incidentA private reminder from the operator or staff.Second incidentA written warning. Documented in the resident file.Third incidentAddressed through the formal conflict resolution process. May advance to the enforcement ladder.
Bi-Weekly Professional Cleaning -- Common Areas
A hired cleaner visits twice per month to handle common area cleaning. This is the baseline professional cleaning standard for this type of home. The cost is built into the room rate.
Common area cleaning tasks include:

Kitchen: wipe all countertops and stovetop, clean the sink and drain, wipe the exterior of all appliances, verify the microwave interior is clean, spot-mop the floor, refill paper towels and dish soap
Bathrooms: clean the toilet inside and out, wipe the sink and countertop, clean the mirror, check and refill soap and paper products, empty waste bins, spot-clean the floor, check drains
Common areas: straighten and tidy all furniture, vacuum or sweep and mop all floors, dust all surfaces, wipe switches and door handles, tidy the entrance

Quality verification: After every cleaning session, the operator or a designated staff member confirms the work meets standard before signing off.
Monthly Deep Clean -- Professional
Once per month a thorough professional deep clean covers the entire home.

Kitchen: clean inside the microwave, oven, and refrigerator; degrease the stovetop and range hood; clean behind and under all appliances; descale the kettle and coffee machine; mop the floor thoroughly
Bathrooms: scrub shower walls and tile grout; deep clean the toilet base; clean the extractor fan; mop with disinfectant; check for and treat any mold
Common areas: vacuum under and behind all furniture; dust all surfaces including high shelves; clean windows inside; steam clean upholstered furniture; inspect and clean the dryer lint trap
Pest check: look for signs of ants, mice, or cockroaches in kitchen and bathroom areas

Optional Room Cleaning -- Resident Request
Residents who would like their private room professionally cleaned may arrange this through the operator. This is an add-on service at additional cost to the resident. The rate is set by the operator per property.
Room Turnover -- After Every Move-Out
Triggered immediately after move-out is confirmed. The operator schedules it, photographs the room before the cleaner arrives, and conducts a final quality check after the cleaner finishes.

Inspection: photograph all surfaces, note any damage, and check inventory against the move-in record.
Strip the room: remove all bedding and towels. Hold any items left by the departing resident for 7 days, then dispose of them.
Dust top to bottom: ceiling fixtures, tops of furniture, shelves, window sills, and baseboards.
Clean all surfaces: wipe furniture, wardrobe interior, desk, door handles, mirror, and windows.
Bathroom if en-suite: full deep clean.
Floor: vacuum or sweep including under all furniture, then mop.
Restock: fresh bedding, fresh towels, and welcome materials.
Final check: walk through the room as the incoming resident would. Test all lights, the lock, the WiFi signal, and all drawers and cabinet doors.

Section 11  |  SOP-WELLNESS  |  Resident Wellness, Emergency Contact, and Transition
This home is not a licensed facility. This protocol exists to provide a reasonable community safety net, not surveillance, not daily oversight, and not a substitute for professional medical services. Every resident is treated as an independent adult.
This protocol is explained to every resident at move-in and acknowledged in writing as a condition of residency. It is presented as a community benefit. This home looks out for its members.
Emergency Contact -- Required at Move-In
Every resident must provide emergency contact information before move-in. No exceptions.
Required informationFull name, relationship to the resident, primary phone number, and an alternate phone number if available.AuthorizationThe resident signs written authorization for management to contact this person and, if necessary, to enter the room if the resident is unreachable and there is genuine concern for their safety.Minimum contactsAt least one emergency contact is required. Two contacts are strongly encouraged.UpdatesThe resident notifies management in writing of any change to emergency contact information.
Wellness Check Triggers
Trigger TypeConditionStandard triggerThe resident has not been seen or responded to any communication in 48 hours and there is no known reason for the absence, such as a planned trip or a family visit.Accelerated triggerAny of the following conditions observed before the 48-hour threshold has passed: a neighbor heard a fall, a cry, or an unusual sound; the resident mentioned feeling unwell in their last communication; mail, medication, or food deliveries are visibly piling up untouched; lights or sounds suggest someone is home but they are not answering; a family member contacts the operator expressing concern.
Escalation Sequence

Step 1: Fellow resident. A neighboring resident knocks on the door. This is warm, informal, and the fastest first response. Management or staff prompts this step if no one has flagged the situation naturally.
Step 2: Staff phone call. If the resident is known to have left the property, or if the door knock gets no response, a staff member calls the resident directly. The tone is a friendly check-in, not a welfare call.
Step 3: Emergency contact. If staff gets no response after reasonable attempts, the emergency contact is called. If a family member initiated the concern, they call first and staff follows as the second contact.
Step 4: Operator decision. If the emergency contact also cannot reach the resident, the operator decides whether to enter the room or contact emergency services based on the full picture of the situation.
Step 5: Emergency services. This is the last resort. It is used when all prior steps have failed and genuine concern for the resident's safety exists.


Documentation: Any wellness check that reaches Step 3 or beyond must be documented regardless of outcome, including the date, time, steps taken, who was contacted, and the result. Even when the resident turns up fine, a record protects everyone.

What This Home Is Not Responsible For
This home is a shared residential property. It is not a licensed facility, an assisted living community, or a medical service provider. The wellness protocol is a community courtesy. Management does not provide medical monitoring, daily check-ins, personal care assistance, or emergency response services beyond what any reasonable neighbor or landlord would provide.
If a resident's needs evolve during their tenancy to the point where this home can no longer safely or appropriately accommodate them, the operator will have an honest conversation about next steps and, where possible, help connect the resident with appropriate senior housing options.
Observable Indicators -- Step by Step Evaluation
The evaluation of a resident's evolving needs is not a single event. It is a pattern recognition process conducted by the operator through regular contact and monthly property walkthroughs. No single indicator below prompts immediate action. A sustained pattern of two or more indicators over four or more weeks prompts the operator to begin the documented evaluation process.
Physical Indicators

Visible and unexplained weight loss over a period of weeks or months
Increased difficulty with mobility that was not present at move-in
Evidence of falls, including unexplained bruising, slow or guarded movement, or references by the resident to having fallen
A decline in personal hygiene that affects shared spaces or is noticed by other residents
Personal care equipment appearing in the home that was not disclosed at move-in, particularly items that suggest ongoing daily assistance needs rather than a temporary recovery situation

Behavioral Indicators

Increasing confusion or disorientation reported by other residents or observed by the operator during regular contact
Missed rent payments after a previously reliable payment history, with no clear financial explanation
Maintenance requests or household incidents suggesting the resident is struggling with tasks they previously handled independently
Significant withdrawal from any household activity the resident previously participated in
Repeated incidents in common areas suggesting the resident is not managing their daily routine safely

Communication Indicators

The emergency contact reaching out with increasing frequency or expressing concern about the resident's situation
The resident making unprompted references to feeling unsafe, unwell, or unable to manage on their own
Other residents raising concerns about a neighbor's wellbeing directly to the operator
Visits from medical professionals becoming more frequent and appearing to reflect an ongoing need rather than a temporary situation

The Evaluation Steps

Step 1: The operator observes and notes indicators as they appear. No action is taken at this stage. The operator pays attention and keeps a private record.
Step 2: When two or more indicators are present over four or more weeks, the operator writes a dated summary of what has been observed. Specific descriptions. Specific dates. No diagnoses, no assumptions, no conclusions about what the observations mean medically. Observable facts only.
Step 3: The operator contacts the emergency contact for a private conversation before approaching the resident. See the emergency contact conversation guide below.
Step 4: Based on the emergency contact conversation, the operator decides whether to approach the resident directly, allow the family to lead the conversation, or conduct a joint conversation with both present.
Step 5: The operator or the family conducts the resident conversation. See the resident conversation guide below.
Step 6: All observations, conversations, and decisions are documented from this point forward. See the documentation guidance below.
Step 7: If the resident and family agree that a transition is appropriate, the operator activates the transition resources described in this section.
Step 8: If the resident disagrees and the operator believes there is a genuine safety concern affecting the resident or other residents in the home, the operator consults the retained real estate attorney before taking any further action.

Conversation Guide -- The Emergency Contact
This conversation is private and happens before approaching the resident in most cases. The emergency contact is often an adult child who is already aware of concerns and may be waiting for someone else to raise them.
Preparation

Review the documented observations and have two or three specific examples ready
Know the lease terms and what the independent living acknowledgment clause says
Have a general sense of local senior housing options so the conversation can move forward if it goes there
Choose a time when the resident is not nearby and cannot overhear

Opening

"Hi [name], this is [operator name] from [property name]. I hope this is not a bad time. I want to have an honest conversation with you about [resident name] because I have noticed some things recently and I think you should know what I am seeing."

Sharing Observations

"Over the past [timeframe] I have noticed [specific example] and [second example if applicable]. I am not trying to draw conclusions or jump ahead. I am sharing this because I think you should know and because I would rather say something than not."

Asking for Their Perspective

"I wanted to talk with you before saying anything to [resident name] because I did not want to upset them without first understanding the bigger picture. Have you noticed similar things? Is there anything going on that would help me understand what I am seeing?"

Listen fully before responding. The family member may have context that changes everything. Or they may confirm the concern and express relief that someone else has noticed.
If the Family Confirms the Concern

"I am glad we are talking about this. I want to be straightforward with you. Silver Living (55+) is independent living and I am not set up to provide personal care services or daily living assistance. What I can do is work with you and [resident name] toward whatever the right next step looks like. I have some local resources available and I am happy to share them when you are ready."

If the Family Is Not Aware or Pushes Back

"I understand, and it is possible there is an explanation I am not aware of. What I would ask is that you keep a closer eye on things and reach out to me if you see the same things I am seeing. I am not trying to rush anyone toward any decision. I just wanted to make sure you knew what I was observing."

Closing

"Thank you for taking the time to talk with me. Please reach out any time. We both want the same thing here, which is for [resident name] to be well and in the right situation for where they are in their life."

Conversation Guide -- The Resident
This is the most sensitive conversation in the Silver Living (55+) operational framework. The goal of the first conversation is not to reach a decision. It is to open an honest dialogue.
Preparation

This conversation happens in person. Never by phone or message.
Choose a private moment when other residents are not nearby.
Sit at the same level as the resident. Do not stand over them.
No paperwork is visible. This is a human conversation, not an administrative meeting.
Have two or three specific observations ready but begin with genuine warmth, not with a list of concerns.

Opening

"[Name], do you have a few minutes? I wanted to sit down with you because I have been thinking about you and I wanted to check in."

Expressing Genuine Concern for Their Wellbeing

"I want to be honest with you because I respect you. I have noticed some things recently that I want to mention, not to create a problem but because I would rather say something to you directly than say nothing at all."

Sharing Observations, Not Conclusions

"I noticed [specific observable example with approximate date]. And [second example if relevant]. I am not telling you what those things mean. I am just sharing what I have seen and asking how you are feeling."

Create space and wait. Do not fill the silence. The resident needs time to process. Some will be relieved. Some will become defensive. Some will become emotional. None of those responses requires an immediate solution from the operator. Listen first.
If the Resident Acknowledges the Concern

"I am glad you felt comfortable being honest with me. I want you to know that I am not here to push you out of your home. What I do want is for you to be in a situation that works well for where you are right now. Can we talk about what that might look like? And would it be all right if we brought [emergency contact name] into this conversation?"

If the Resident Pushes Back or Does Not Acknowledge the Concern

"I hear you and I am not asking you to make any decisions today. All I am asking is that you know I am paying attention and that you can always come to me if things start to feel harder. That door is open."

Do not press further in the first conversation. Document the conversation and the resident's response. Return to the topic in three to four weeks if indicators continue or worsen.
If There Is an Immediate Safety Concern

"I have to be straightforward with you about something, and I say this because I am genuinely concerned about your wellbeing. What I have been seeing makes me worried that this home may not be giving you what you need right now. I do not say that to alarm you. I say it because I have a responsibility to you and to everyone else here. I think we need to include [emergency contact name] in this conversation as soon as possible. Can we do that together?"

Documentation Guidance
The operator maintains a confidential file for each resident, separate from general property records. This file is not shared with other residents or with staff who do not have a direct need for it. It is available to the operator's attorney if a legal question arises.
Dated observation logWritten descriptions of specific things observed, when they were observed, and by whom. Specific dates and specific descriptions only. No medical diagnoses, no assumptions about causes, no characterizations beyond what was directly observed. Example: "On [date], resident appeared disoriented in the kitchen for approximately 10 minutes before seeming to reorient. Observed directly by the operator."Emergency contact logDate, time, name and relationship of the person spoken with, a summary of what was discussed, and any commitments made by either party.Resident conversation logDate, time, location, who was present, a summary of what was said, how the resident responded, and what was agreed or left open.Written communicationsCopies of any emails, text messages, or letters related to the resident's evolving situation.Lease documentsA copy of the signed lease and any addendums including the independent living acknowledgment clause.Transition documentationIf a transition is agreed upon: the agreed timeline, the written 30-day notice to vacate when received, the resources provided to the resident and family, and the final outcome.
Transition Path
When a transition is agreed upon, the operator follows a defined process that treats the departing resident with dignity and supports the family through what is often a difficult period.
Personal Care Services and Silver Living (55+)
Personal care services are not compatible with the Silver Living (55+) model as an ongoing arrangement. When a resident's needs have reached the point of requiring regular personal assistance with daily activities, the right environment is one designed to provide that assistance. A Silver Living (55+) home is not that environment.
A narrow exception exists for temporary and time-limited visits during non-quiet hours only, such as a visiting nurse during a post-surgical recovery of defined and limited duration. These visits are pre-approved through the recurring visitor process in Section 3. When the temporary situation has resolved, the approved visits end. If the temporary situation becomes permanent, the evaluation and transition process described in this section begins.
Building the Local Professional Network
Before opening any Silver Living (55+) property, the operator begins building relationships with the following professionals in their local area. This network is one of the most meaningful things an operator can offer a resident and family during a difficult transition.

Local assisted living facilities: visit them in person before you ever need them. Understand their levels of service, their costs, their application process, and their typical availability. Know which facilities are well regarded locally. Build a relationship with an admissions contact at two or three facilities so you can make a personal introduction when the time comes.
Memory care facilities: these are separate from general assisted living and are specifically designed for residents experiencing cognitive decline or dementia. Know which local options exist and how to access them.
Senior housing advisors and geriatric care managers: these professionals specialize in helping families navigate the full landscape of senior housing options. A trusted referral to a senior housing advisor can save a family weeks of confusion and research during an already stressful period. This is one of the most valuable referrals an operator can offer.
Social workers: hospital-based and community-based social workers are often the critical bridge between an acute health event and a long-term housing decision. Know who the key contacts are at local hospitals and community health organizations.
Elder law attorneys: these attorneys specialize in issues that frequently arise when an older adult's situation changes significantly, including Medicaid planning, power of attorney, guardianship, and estate matters. Having a trusted referral available is a meaningful resource for families who have not yet engaged this kind of counsel.

Financial Resources the Operator Should Understand
The operator is not a financial advisor and does not make recommendations about any resident's specific financial situation. What the operator can do is be generally informed about the categories of financial assistance that exist for older adults transitioning to a higher level of housing, so they can point families toward the right resources.
MedicareCovers some short-term skilled nursing and rehabilitation following a qualifying hospitalization but does not cover ongoing assisted living. Operators should understand this clearly so families are not given false expectations about what Medicare will fund.MedicaidCovers long-term care for qualifying low-income individuals in many states, but eligibility rules are complex, vary significantly by state, and often involve a look-back period for asset transfers. An elder law attorney is the right resource for any family exploring Medicaid as a funding source. The operator provides the referral, not the guidance.Veterans benefitsThe VA Aid and Attendance benefit provides meaningful financial assistance to eligible veterans and surviving spouses to help cover the cost of assisted living. This benefit is significantly underutilized because many older veterans and their families are unaware it exists. Every Silver Living (55+) operator knows this benefit exists and can refer families to a VA benefits counselor or accredited claims agent.Long-term care insuranceSome residents may have purchased long-term care insurance earlier in life. If a resident or family member mentions this, encourage them to contact the insurance company early in the process. Claims can take time to process and benefits may have specific eligibility triggers.Bridge financingIf a resident owns real property or holds other significant assets, a financial planner who specializes in senior transitions may be able to discuss options such as a short-term bridge loan or the use of proceeds from the sale of an asset to cover assisted living costs during a transition period. This applies only when real estate or significant assets are part of the resident's financial picture. The operator refers the family to a qualified financial planner rather than providing specific advice.Area Agency on AgingEvery region in the United States has a local Area Agency on Aging that provides free information and referrals for older adults and their families. This is often the best first call for a family that does not know where to start. Every Silver Living (55+) operator has the local Area Agency on Aging contact information in their resource file before they ever need it.
The Operational Transition Steps

Step 1: When a transition is agreed upon, the operator and the resident or family agree on a transition timeline in writing. A minimum of 30 days from the decision to the move-out date is reasonable unless an acute safety concern requires a faster resolution.
Step 2: The operator provides the resident and family with a written list of local senior housing resources, including the assisted living facilities and senior housing professionals in the operator's local network. The operator offers to make a personal introduction if the family finds that helpful.
Step 3: The operator shares a summary of relevant financial assistance categories and encourages the family to consult with an elder law attorney and a senior housing advisor early in the process. The operator provides referrals to local professionals in both categories.
Step 4: Rent continues under the existing lease terms until a formal written 30-day notice to vacate is received. The notice starts the 30-day clock. Rent is due through the end of the notice period in accordance with the lease. Initiating a transition conversation does not alter the existing lease terms, create a payment waiver, or suspend any financial obligation. The lease governs.
Step 5: The move-out process follows the standard move-out SOP with sensitivity to the circumstances. The cleaning fee applies as stated in the lease. The deposit is returned within 14 days of move-out with itemized deductions in writing.
Step 6: After the resident has moved to their new situation, the operator follows up with the family to confirm the resident has settled. This is a human gesture consistent with the Silver Living (55+) philosophy.
Step 7: The operator updates their local resource list with anything learned during the process, including which facilities had availability, which contacts were responsive, and which resources were most useful to the family. This makes every subsequent transition smoother.

Section 12  |  SOP-ACCESSIBILITY  |  Accessibility and Accommodation
Approach
This type of home strives to be as comfortable and accessible as reasonably possible for older residents. Because most properties are existing structures, the scope of accessibility features will vary by property. Accessibility improvements are treated as meaningful investments in the quality of the home wherever they are physically and financially feasible.

The following features are considered desirable additions to Silver Living (55+) homes where feasible: grab bars in showers and beside toilets, non-slip surfaces in bathrooms and at entries, lever-style door handles, adequate lighting in hallways and common areas, and low-threshold shower entries. These are goals and aspirations, not uniform requirements across all properties. Most homes are existing structures and retrofitting is not always possible prior to opening.

Resident Accommodation Requests
If a resident requests a modification to their room or to the home to accommodate a specific need, management evaluates each request individually using three criteria.

Is the modification physically feasible given the property's existing structure?
Is it within a reasonable budget given the scope of the request?
Does it benefit the requesting resident without negatively impacting other residents or the property?

If all three criteria are met, the modification is made. If any criterion cannot be met, management responds in writing, explains why, and offers an alternative where one exists. All accommodation requests and responses are documented in writing and kept in the resident's file.
Emotional Support Animals
This home operates under a no-pets policy. However, legitimate Emotional Support Animal requests are a protected category under the Fair Housing Act and must be handled carefully and individually. Every ESA decision is made by the operator. Staff and VAs never approve or deny an ESA request independently.
Required documentationA letter from a licensed mental health professional or physician confirming the resident has a disability-related need for the animal.Pet health recordsCurrent vaccination records for the animal.Grounds for denialAn ESA may be denied if the animal poses a direct threat to the health or safety of other residents, causes significant property damage, or if another resident documents a severe allergy or medical condition that would be worsened by the animal's presence. Behavior issues that disturb other residents are also grounds for denial or removal.Location complianceESA regulations vary by state and municipality. The operator verifies local law before responding to any ESA request. Some jurisdictions provide protections beyond federal minimums.
Medical Equipment
Residents requiring CPAP machines, oxygen concentrators, or similar personal medical equipment are welcome. These are common and manageable needs for this demographic. Residents requiring hospital beds or power wheelchairs will need a level of space and care that this type of home is not designed to provide. This is identified compassionately during the welcome conversation, and those residents are redirected to more appropriate options.
The operator assesses the electrical capacity of each room for any new resident who indicates during the welcome conversation that they use electrical medical equipment. This is a property-specific evaluation done before the resident moves in.
Section 13  |  SOP-COMMUNITY  |  Senior Community Engagement
Community is one of the most important things this housing model offers. Isolation and loneliness are genuine health concerns for older adults, and a shared home done well is a meaningful antidote. The approach here is organic. We create the conditions for community to develop naturally, supported by intentional gestures that make residents feel genuinely welcomed and cared for.
All programming and community activities are completely voluntary. No resident is ever pressured to participate. The best community experiences happen when people choose to be there.

The operator's personal presence in the home is the single most powerful community tool available. An owner or manager who knows residents by name, shows up occasionally, and takes a genuine interest in the home creates something no event or gift can replicate. The role is not just property management. It is tending a community.

Mandatory -- Required for Every New Resident

Group text introduction: management sends a welcome message to the household group text introducing the new resident by first name on or before their move-in day.
Welcome note posted on the refrigerator or common area bulletin board.
Name placard placed outside the new resident's bedroom door before they arrive.

Welcome Gestures -- New Resident
The following are suggestions for the operator. Selections are based on budget, property culture, and resident preferences.

Handwritten welcome note from the owner personally
Welcome card signed by current residents
Gift basket in the room on arrival, with local snacks, a candle, a small plant, or personal care items
Printed card with a few warm things to know about the home, written conversationally rather than as a rule sheet
Flowers or a small plant in the room
A list of local restaurants and services recommended by the owner
Coffee or tea sampler
A cozy throw blanket

Household Welcome Gestures -- For Everyone
A gesture that includes all current residents signals that the new arrival is joining a community, not just a house.

A box of donuts or pastries the morning after the new resident arrives
A cheesecake with individual slices
A fresh fruit basket in the kitchen
A flower arrangement for the common area
A cheese and crackers board left in the kitchen
A box of chocolates or seasonal candy
A seasonal pie
A tray of bakery or homemade cookies
Sparkling cider with glasses set out

Week-Long Welcome Arc
The welcome should not be a single moment. It should carry through the entire first week.
Day 1Welcome note and room gift in place before arrival. A household treat is available.Day 2A household gesture in the kitchen, such as pastries, fruit, or something shared.Day 3The operator or a staff member checks in personally by text or phone.Day 4A passive shared gesture: fresh flowers, a movie on the common television, or background music.Day 5Another household treat or communal gesture.Day 7A personal follow-up from the operator acknowledging the resident's first full week.
Ongoing Passive Touchpoints
Low-effort, high-impact gestures that signal the home is cared for without requiring any resident to show up for anything.

Fresh flowers on the kitchen table weekly
A seasonal fruit bowl replenished regularly
A community puzzle left out on a common table
A book exchange shelf in the common area
A monthly one-page newsletter from the operator, warm and personal in tone
Seasonal decorations that change throughout the year
A whiteboard or chalkboard in the kitchen for casual notes and community messages
A community recipe box where residents can contribute their favorite recipes
An optional resident spotlight on the bulletin board, where a resident shares a few words about themselves voluntarily
Morning background music in common areas
A stocked and regularly refreshed coffee and tea station
Seasonal door decorations and entry touches

Occasional Events -- All Opt-In
Events work best when they are low-pressure, easy to participate in partially, and centered on the home rather than on forcing residents to engage directly with each other.

Holiday decorating together: Christmas tree trimming, Halloween pumpkins, or a Thanksgiving table
Movie night with snacks provided
A visit from a friendly, calm dog or a certified therapy animal
Movie theater tickets or gift cards for the household
A group outing to a local restaurant, farmers market, or botanical garden
Seasonal celebrations such as a Fourth of July spread or a Valentine's Day treat
A local musician or low-key entertainer brought to the home for an hour
A cooking demonstration or simple class in the kitchen
A game afternoon with cards, board games, or puzzles
A casual book club with one book and one relaxed conversation
A holiday card making session with supplies provided
A seasonal baking session: cookies at Christmas, a pie at Thanksgiving
A morning coffee hour hosted by the operator
A gardening afternoon if outdoor space is available
A local day trip for anyone interested

Operator Presence

Occasional drop-by visits that are natural and genuine, not announced
Knowing every resident by name and using it
Remembering and acknowledging resident birthdays
A personal check-in text or call to each resident once a month
Acknowledging tenancy milestones such as a six-month or one-year anniversary
Sending a card for significant holidays or personal events
Being reachable and responsive in a way that feels personal, not corporate

Referral Incentive Program
When a room is vacant, current residents in good standing are invited to refer someone they know. A resident who refers a new tenant who signs a lease and completes their first full month receives a reward of their choice: a rent reduction on the next month's payment, or a gift of equivalent value. The referral must be registered with the operator before the new resident applies.
Section 14  |  SOP-ONBOARD  |  Resident Onboarding
Onboarding is where every other SOP comes together. It is the first impression, the foundation of the resident relationship, and the moment that sets the tone for everything that follows. For this demographic, many of whom are navigating a significant life transition, this moment carries more weight than it does in any other housing context.
Operator presenceThe operator, whether the owner, property manager, or a designated employee, must be present at every move-in. Non-negotiable.Payment setupCompleted at lease signing. Confirmed on file before move-in day.Format preferenceIn-person is always preferred. Fully remote onboarding is a last resort only.
Lease Clause Guidance -- Independent Living Acknowledgment
This is not a lease template. The following describes recommended elements for a lease clause or signed addendum that addresses a resident's evolving needs over time. Each operator has this language reviewed by their local real estate attorney before including it in any lease. Enforceability varies by state and local jurisdiction, and qualified legal counsel must confirm the specific language used.
The recommended lease clause addresses four elements.

Definition of the housing type: The lease states clearly that the property is Silver Living (55+) independent senior co-living and that the operator does not provide personal care services, medical supervision, or assistance with activities of daily living. The resident acknowledges this in writing at signing.
Resident self-assessment acknowledgment: The resident confirms at signing that they currently meet the independent living standard for this home. They agree to notify management if their needs change to a point where they require regular personal assistance with daily activities. The tone of this acknowledgment is collaborative, not adversarial.
Collaborative transition agreement: The resident and operator agree that if the resident's needs evolve beyond what this home can safely accommodate, they will work together toward a transition plan. The operator commits to a reasonable notice period and to making available the transition resources described in SOP-WELLNESS. The resident commits to engaging honestly with that process.
Continuity of lease terms: The resident acknowledges that initiating a transition conversation does not alter the existing lease terms. Rent remains due on the agreed date until a formal 30-day written notice to vacate is received and the notice period has elapsed. The lease governs throughout.


Have this clause reviewed by a local real estate attorney before use in any lease. The specific language that is enforceable in one jurisdiction may not be appropriate in another. This guidance describes intent and recommended elements, not final contract language.


Call the resident directly to confirm the arrival time and answer any last-minute questions. Email alone is not sufficient.
Confirm all current residents have been notified of the arrival.
Verify all welcome gestures and room preparation are complete.
Confirm the name placard is on the door and storage spaces are labeled.
Confirm the emergency contact is on file.
Confirm the payment method is confirmed from lease signing.

The Arrival Experience

Greet the resident at the door personally. If a family member is present, welcome them warmly.
Help with bags and boxes. Do not just watch.
Offer something to drink before anything else.
Give them a quiet moment to take in the space.
Begin the orientation tour only when they seem ready.

Orientation Tour and Safety Walkthrough

Begin with common areas: the living room, kitchen, laundry, and outdoor space.
Show the labeled kitchen shelf and refrigerator space personally.
Introduce the community pantry.
Show the bulletin board and the welcome note.
Complete the full safety and security walkthrough in person:
Every smoke alarm location
Every fire extinguisher location
All exterior and interior lighting
Camera locations and what each one covers
All door locks with hands-on demonstration
Emergency exit routes
Water shutoff location
Breaker panel location
Walk them to their room last. Let it feel like a reveal.
Demonstrate the smart lock as many times as needed. Do not move on until they can operate it independently and confidently.


During the safety walkthrough: "Your comfort and safety are our highest priority here. If you ever notice something that concerns you, or if you have any suggestions for how we can make this home better for you, please tell us. We genuinely want to know."

The House Guidelines Conversation
This is a conversation, not a reading. Cover all key items, then hand them the printed House Rules document in Appendix A to keep at their own reference.

Quiet hours and the specific times they begin and end
Guest policy: daytime visitors are welcome, the resident must be present at all times, and no overnight guests are permitted under any circumstances
Pre-approval process for recurring visitors, including temporary medical or personal assistance visits during non-quiet hours
Kitchen and refrigerator storage system and resident cleanup responsibilities
Community pantry
No smoking, vaping, candles, or incense inside the home
Maintenance request process: one channel only
Wellness check protocol, presented warmly as a community safety net
Tampering with home systems is prohibited and carries an automatic Step 2 response
Payment due date, 5-day grace period, and automatic late fee on day 6
30-day notice to vacate and cleaning fee at move-out

The Goodbye Moment
The last thing the resident feels as the operator leaves should be confidence in how things work, comfort in asking questions, a genuine sense of welcome, and clarity on who to contact and how.

Suggested closing: "You are all set. This is your home now. If anything comes up, anything at all, here is how to reach us. We are glad you are here."

Section 15  |  SOP-CONFLICT  |  Conflict Resolution
Most conflict in a shared home comes from unmet expectations, not bad intentions. Clear house guidelines communicated well at move-in prevent the majority of issues before they start. When conflict does arise, a consistent, calm, and fair response is the most effective tool available.
Communication Rule
Conflicts are not resolved by text or email. If an issue requires a real conversation, a call or in-person meeting is scheduled. Do not attempt to mediate a resident conflict through a messaging platform.
Resolution Steps

Receive the complaint and log it with the date, time, and the name of the resident who reported it.
Speak with the complainant to understand the full issue before taking any action.
Approach the other party calmly and privately. Reference the relevant house guideline, not the other resident's complaint.
First offense: a verbal or written reminder. Documented in the resident file.
Second offense: a written warning with a reference to the lease.
Third offense: a formal conversation with the operator. Potential lease action.
Follow up with the complainant within 24 hours to confirm the issue has been addressed.

Common Issues and Responses
NoiseEnforce quiet hours consistently. Addressing the first complaint sends the message that the rule is real. Letting it go signals the opposite.Kitchen conflictNumbered storage and labeled refrigerator space resolve most kitchen disputes before they start. The community pantry reduces food-related tension.Guest policyFollow the enforcement ladder: Warning, Fine, Immediate Removal. Document every step.Cleaning disputesProfessional bi-weekly cleaning removes the most common source of common-area conflict. Disputes drop sharply when cleaning is on a reliable schedule.Personality clashesConsistent rule enforcement depersonalizes conflict. Act as a neutral party. In rare cases, helping a resident exit gracefully is better than allowing one difficult situation to affect the entire household.Maintenance frustrationAcknowledge quickly. A resident who feels unheard escalates. A resident who receives a response within 2 hours almost never does.Home system tamperingDo not treat this as a minor issue. Issue a Step 2 fine immediately. Post a public notice in the home reminding all residents of the policy.
Section 16  |  SOP-EMERGENCY  |  Emergency Response
FireActivate the alarm. Call 911. Evacuate using designated routes. Account for all residents. Contact the operator immediately.MedicalCall 911 immediately. Stay with the resident until EMS arrives. Contact the emergency contact per SOP-WELLNESS. Notify the operator. Document within 1 hour.Security breachLock down common areas if it is safe to do so. Call 911. Document what was observed. Notify the operator. Conduct a lock audit after the incident.Water leakShut off the water main. The location is in the Property Bible. Photograph the damage. Notify the operator. Dispatch the Tier 2 plumber. Protect electronics and resident belongings where possible.Power outageCheck the breaker panel. The location is in the Property Bible. If it is not a breaker issue, call the utility company. Notify the operator. Distribute flashlights if available.WiFi outageUnplug the modem and router, wait 30 seconds, and plug them back in. If the issue persists, call the ISP. Notify the operator.Lock failureUse the backup entry method listed in the Property Bible. Document the failure. Contact the handyman for same-day repair. Notify affected residents.
All incidents must be logged within 1 hour of resolution, including the date, time, a description of what happened, who was involved, what action was taken, and the outcome. Any incident that involves emergency services requires an operator debrief within 24 hours and a protocol review if needed.
On-call coverage: Someone with decision-making authority must be reachable 24 hours a day. Missed calls must be returned within 5 minutes. The on-call person must be able to provide guidance or dispatch within 10 minutes.
Section 17  |  SOP-VENDORS  |  Vendor Management
Contractors are not external help. They are embedded components of the operating system. Every contractor falls into one of three tiers, and each tier requires a different level of planning, documentation, and control.
Tier 1 -- Operational Infrastructure
Examples: Cleaners, pest control, landscapers, handymen.
These contractors are present at the property weekly or monthly. They shape the resident experience directly. Tier 1 contractors must understand what done looks like, where their boundaries are with residents, how work is verified, and how issues are escalated. They need to be SOP-informed, not just task-assigned.
Tier 2 -- Emergency-Ready
Examples: Plumbers, electricians, HVAC technicians.
These contractors are rarely needed but critical when they are. Build the relationship and have their contact information in the Property Bible before any emergency occurs. A water heater failure at 10 PM on a Sunday is not the time to begin searching for a plumber.
Tier 3 -- Infrequent but Inevitable
Examples: Roofers, foundation specialists, real estate attorneys.
These are reactive by nature. Bid everything possible in advance. Document everything. Never panic-hire on major structural or roofing work. The premium for rushed work in these categories is significant.

Real estate attorney: Every operator must identify and retain a local real estate attorney familiar with landlord-tenant law in their jurisdiction before opening any property. This attorney is listed in the Property Bible as a Tier 2 vendor. The operator has a specific consultation with this attorney about immediate removal for cause and documents that guidance before ever needing it.

Vendor Card Format
For each vendor in the Property Bible:
ServiceWhat they doNamePrimary contact namePhoneDirect number, not just the company main lineHoursWhen they respond and their expected response timeAccessHow they enter the property, where supplies are kept, and any special notes
Appendix A  |  House Rules -- Resident Copy
[Property Name]
[Property Address]
Your Home -- A Quick Reference

Welcome to your new home. We want you to feel completely comfortable here. These simple guidelines help everyone in the house feel safe, respected, and at ease. If you have any questions at all, please reach out to us directly.

Quiet Hours
[Operator sets time]  every day. Quiet hours apply to all areas of the home, including your room, the kitchen, the laundry room, and all shared spaces. Please be mindful of your neighbors during these hours. Using headphones or earbuds for television and other devices during non-quiet evening hours is appreciated.
Visitors
You are welcome to have visitors during the day. A few simple guidelines keep everyone comfortable.

You must be home whenever a visitor is here. Visitors may not be in the home without you present.
Visitors must leave before quiet hours begin.
No overnight guests are permitted under any circumstances.
If you have a regular visitor, such as a caregiver or a family member who helps out, please let us know in advance and we will work through the approval process with you.
Visitors are welcome in common areas and your room. They are not permitted in any other resident's room.

Kitchen and Storage
Everyone has their own labeled shelf in the kitchen cabinets and their own space in the refrigerator. Your space is marked with your room number. Please follow these guidelines every day.

Wash, dry, and put away your dishes, pots, pans, and utensils immediately after use. Do not leave them in the sink or on the counter.
Wipe down the stovetop and surrounding surfaces after every use.
Always cover food before microwaving. Wipe out any spills or splatters in the microwave immediately after use.
Keep your food in your assigned shelf and refrigerator space only. Label perishable items with your name and the date.
Clean up any spills on counters, the stovetop, or the floor right away.
Take out the trash when it is full. Do not leave it overflowing.

The Community Pantry is a shared space stocked with basic non-perishable items. Please help yourself whenever you need something.
Your Belongings
Please keep your personal belongings in your room. Common areas are for everyone and are not personal storage space. Items left in common areas will be returned to your room.
Smoking and Substances
No smoking of any kind is permitted inside the home. This includes cigarettes, cigars, cannabis, and any other smoked substance. No vaping, candles, or incense are permitted inside the home. If smoking is permitted on the property, it must take place at least 15 feet from any entrance or open window.
No illegal substances are permitted on the property. Legal cannabis and other prescribed substances are welcome with a valid doctor's prescription. Smoking of any prescribed substance follows the same rules as tobacco.
Home Systems
Please do not adjust, move, cover, or tamper with any home system, including cameras, locks, thermostats, smoke alarms, and internet routers. These systems keep everyone in the home safe and secure. If you have a concern about any home system, please contact us directly.
Rent Payment
Rent is due on [due date] each month. There is a 5-day grace period. A late fee is applied automatically on day 6. This is a firm policy and we appreciate your understanding. If you ever anticipate a timing issue, please reach out to us before the due date.
Moving Out
When you are ready to move on, all we ask is 30 days written notice. A cleaning fee will be applied at move-out as outlined in your lease. We will schedule a move-out inspection and handle the return of your deposit within 14 days. Before you leave, please return all remotes and access devices to their designated locations, remove all personal belongings and trash from your room, clean out any refrigerator in your room, and leave the room in clean condition.
Emergencies
For any emergency in the home, call [operator phone number] first. For life-threatening emergencies, call 911 immediately and then notify us.
Smoke alarms are located at [locations]. Fire extinguishers are located at [locations]. Emergency exits are at [locations].
Maintenance
If something in the home needs attention, please let us know through [maintenance channel]. We respond to urgent issues within a few hours and routine items within 24 hours. Please do not hesitate to reach out. We want the home to work well for you.
A Note From Us

Your comfort and safety are our highest priority. This is your home, and we mean that genuinely. If anything is not working well for you, whether it is something in the house or just something on your mind, please tell us. We are here and we want to hear from you.

Your operator[Name]Phone[Phone number]Email[Email address]Maintenance requests[Channel or contact]Emergency line[24-hour contact]
Appendix B  |  Recurring Visitor Approval Letter
This letter is completed by the operator, provided to the resident, and may be posted in a common area so that all residents are aware of the authorized visitor. A copy is kept in the resident's file.
[Property Name]  |  Recurring Visitor Approval
Date of approval[Date]Resident name[Resident full name]Resident room number[Room number]Visitor name[Visitor full name]Relationship to resident[e.g., daughter, home health aide, family friend]Reason for visits[e.g., regular caregiving assistance, medical support, family check-ins]Approved visit days[e.g., Monday, Wednesday, Friday -- or specify as needed]Approved visit hours[e.g., 9 AM to 6 PM -- must fall within non-quiet hours]Approval expiration date[Date -- default is 30 days from the date of this letter]Approved areasCommon areas and the resident's room only. Not permitted in any other resident's room without separate written approval.Resident must be presentYes. The resident must be present during all visits covered by this approval. This approval does not authorize the visitor to be in the home without the resident.Operator name[Operator full name]Operator signature____________________________Resident signature____________________________  (acknowledging receipt and understanding of terms)

This approval expires on the date listed above. Renewal requires a new written request from the resident. This approval may be withdrawn at any time if the visitor causes a disturbance, violates any house guideline, or if other residents raise documented concerns. Questions or concerns about this approved visitor may be directed to the operator at [phone number] or [email address].

Appendix C  |  Source Index
The procedures in this document were developed using the following source materials as reference frameworks. All content has been adapted and significantly modified for the Silver Living (55+) independent senior co-living model described in this document.
SourceMaterial ReferencedCoLiving OperationsSOP-040 SWAT Interview, SOP-003 Tenant Avatar Development, Property Bible framework, Vendor Tier System, Guest Policy, Community Pantry concept, physical design as behavioral enforcementColiving.comHost guidance on common operational mistakes, unit economics, community building, and conflict preventionEverything ColivingCleaning schedule SOPs, room turnover protocol, check-in and check-out procedures, community event frameworksOneFam HostelsSOP writing methodology, format standards, and operational performance metricsAlbany State University Housing and Residence LifeOn-call coverage standards, emergency response protocols, and opening and closing checklistsEverything Coliving SOP BundleCheck-in, check-out, maintenance, cleaning, noise, and emergency SOP templatesCoLiving Operations Trash ManagementTrash infrastructure standards, bin setup, and operational tips
[Operator Name]  |  Silver Living (55+) Co-Living Operations  |  Master SOP Collection  |  Version 1.0  |  [Date]
Developed by Ralph Pombo  |  ralphpombo.com  |  thecolivinginsider.com
